Missouri, session 2026, HB3302.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 589, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 589.765, to read as follows:
589.765. 1. Beginning January 1, 2027, the Missouri state highway patrol shall
post on its website, in a searchable format prescribed by the department of public safety,
the names of any person convicted of animal abuse under section 578.012 on or after
such date.
2. All circuit court clerks shall forward a copy of the judgment and date of birth
of all persons convicted of animal abuse to the Missouri state highway patrol within
sixty calendar days of the date of judgment.
3. Upon a person's first conviction for animal abuse under section 578.012, the
Missouri state highway patrol shall maintain the person's name on the list under
subsection 1 of this section for two years following the date of conviction, after which
time the highway patrol shall remove the person's name from the list, provided that the
person is not convicted of a second or subsequent offense of animal abuse during such
two-year period.
4. Upon a person's second or subsequent conviction for animal abuse, the
Missouri state highway patrol shall maintain the person's name on the list under
subsection 1 of this section for five years following the date of the most recent
conviction, after which time the highway patrol shall remove the person's name from
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3302 2
the list, provided that the person is not convicted of a second or subsequent offense of
animal abuse within such five-year period.
5. The Missouri state highway patrol shall remove a person's name from the
registry list if the sole offense that subjected the person to the provisions of this section is
expunged.
6. The department of public safety may promulgate rules and regulations to
implement the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section
shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of
chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to
chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule
proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔